Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5265
Rules and regulations.

The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Small Employer Health Insurance Availability Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 43.